Texas statutes.
EDUCATION CODE

TITLE 3. HIGHER EDUCATION

SUBTITLE D. THE TEXAS A & M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM

CHAPTER 87. OTHER ACADEMIC INSTITUTIONS IN THE TEXAS A & M UNIVERSITY SYSTEM

SUBCHAPTER A. TARLETON STATE UNIVERSITY

Sec. 87.001. TARLETON STATE UNIVERSITY. Tarleton State University is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Stephenville. It is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3206, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 800, ch. 360, Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 1973; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 2152, ch. 394, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1983.

Sec. 87.002. STUDENT LOAN FUND. The sum of $75,000 donated by the citizenship of Stephenville and Erath County shall be administered by the board of regents for the benefit of the students of Tarleton State University in such manner as the board may deem advisable.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3206, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 800, ch. 360, Sec. 2, eff. June 12, 1973; Acts 1983, 68th Leg., p. 2152, ch. 394, Sec. 2, eff. June 17, 1983.

Sec. 87.004. TEXAS INSTITUTE FOR APPLIED ENVIRONMENTAL RESEARCH. (a) The Texas Institute for Applied Environmental Research at Tarleton State University is established.

(b) The organization, control, and management of the institute is vested in the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(c) The board of regents shall approve the employment of personnel by and the operating budget of the institute. An employee of the institute is an employee of Tarleton State University.

(d) The institute shall:

(1) conduct applied research on environmental issues that have public policy implications;

(2) provide a setting for environmental studies that focus on the interface between government and the private sector;

(3) provide national leadership on emerging environmental policy; and

(4) establish interdisciplinary programs or partnerships with public or private institutions of higher education, governmental agencies, or private entities to develop and implement new policies, technology, strategies, relationships, and sources of funding.

(e) The institute may cooperate or contract with a public or private entity to perform the duties of the institute.

(f) The board of regents may accept gifts and grants from a public or private source for the benefit of the institute.

Added by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 270, Sec. 1, eff. June 5, 1991.

SUBCHAPTER B. PRAIRIE VIEW A&M UNIVERSITY

Sec. 87.101. PRAIRIE VIEW A & M UNIVERSITY. Prairie View A&M University is a coeducational institution of higher education located at Prairie View, in Waller County.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3206, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 580, ch. 249, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 87.102. GOVERNING BOARD. The university is under the control and supervision of the board of directors of The Texas A&M University System. The board has the same powers and duties with respect to this university as are conferred on it by statute with respect to Texas A&M University.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3206, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1973, 63rd Leg., p. 580, ch. 249, Sec. 2, eff. Aug. 27, 1973.

Sec. 87.103. CERTAIN LAND IN WALLER COUNTY UNDER CONTROL OF BOARD. (a) The 110 acres, more or less, of land in Waller County near Prairie View A&M University, but not adjoining its campus, conveyed as a gift to the Governor of the State of Texas when the site for then Prairie View Normal and Industrial College was purchased, is placed under the control and supervision of the Board of Directors of The Texas A&M University System for the use and benefit of Prairie View A&M University.

(b) The land is described in the deed of record in Record Book 3, pages 496, 497, and 498 of the records of the County Clerk of Waller County as being 110 acres of land off a 320-acre survey patented to the heirs of Solomon Smith No. 276, Vol. 11, the said 110 acres lying on the south side of said 320-acre survey and adjoining the Law Survey and is described by metes and bounds in Decree of Partition in District Court of Austin County in Matters Probate between Helen M. Kirby and the estate of Jared E. Kirby, deceased.

(c) The board of directors is authorized to lease the land for oil, gas, sulphur, and other mineral development under existing law applicable to other lands under its control and supervision and to apply the proceeds from such lease to the use and benefit of Prairie View A&M University.

Added by Acts 1975, 64th Leg., p. 570, ch. 229, Sec. 1, eff. May 20, 1975.

Sec. 87.104. PURPOSE OF THE UNIVERSITY. In addition to its designation as a statewide general purpose institution of higher education and its designation as a land-grant institution, Prairie View A&M University is designated as a statewide special purpose institution of higher education for instruction, research, and public service programs dedicated to:

(1) enabling students of diverse economic, ethnic, and cultural backgrounds to realize their full potential;

(2) assisting small and medium-sized communities to achieve their optimal growth and development; and

(3) assisting small and medium-sized agricultural, business, and industrial enterprises to manage their growth and development effectively.

Added by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3040, ch. 795, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1981. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 47, Sec. 1, eff. May 3, 2001.

Sec. 87.105. CENTER FOR THE STUDY AND PREVENTION OF JUVENILE CRIME AND DELINQUENCY. (a) The Center for the Study and Prevention of Juvenile Crime and Delinquency is established at Prairie View A&M University.

(b) The organization, control, and management of the center is vested in the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(c) The board of regents shall approve the employment of personnel by and the operating budget of the center. An employee of the center is an employee of Prairie View A&M University.

(d) The center may:

(1) conduct, coordinate, collect, and evaluate research in all areas relating to juvenile crime and delinquency;

(2) provide a setting for educational programs relating to juvenile crime and delinquency, including degree programs at Prairie View A&M University and other educational programs such as continuing education and in-service training for criminal justice and social service professionals;

(3) serve as a state and national resource for information on juvenile crime and delinquency; and

(4) in connection with its research and educational programs:

(A) develop programs, policies, and strategies to address juvenile crime and delinquency and related social problems; and

(B) create partnerships, collaborative efforts, or outreach, public service, or technical assistance programs to assist communities, governmental agencies, or private entities to implement programs, policies, and strategies that address juvenile crime and delinquency and related social problems.

(e) The center may enter into a cooperative agreement or contract with a public or private entity to perform the duties of the center.

(f) The board of regents may accept gifts and grants from a public or private source for the benefit of the center.

(g) Establishment of the center is subject to the availability of funds for that purpose.

Added by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 1086, Sec. 45, eff. Sept. 1, 1997.

Sec. 87.106. INSTITUTE FOR PRESERVATION OF HISTORY AND CULTURE. (a) The board of regents of The Texas A&M University System shall establish at Prairie View A&M University an institute for the preservation of Texas and American history and culture.

(b) The organization, control, and management of the institute is vested in the board of regents.

(c) The employment of personnel by and the operating budget of the institute are subject to the approval of the board of regents. An employee of the institute is an employee of Prairie View A&M University.

(d) The mission of the institute is to collect, preserve, study, and make available for research information, records, documents, artifacts, and other items relating to Texas history and culture and to the history and culture of the United States and the Americas as that history and culture relates to Texas. The institute shall give special emphasis to collecting, preserving, and studying information and items relating to the role and contributions of African Americans to Texas history and culture, including:

(1) the history of African-American education in Texas;

(2) the contributions of African Americans to military history; and

(3) the role and contributions of African Americans in the settlement, development, and culture of Texas, including in the areas of government, agriculture, science and industry, labor and demography, business, nursing and medicine, public health, architecture and engineering, the professions, sports, and the arts.

(e) Consistent with its mission, the institute may:

(1) establish and operate a museum, archives, automated systems for data access and retrieval, or similar facilities; and

(2) operate educational and awareness programs, particularly for students in public education.

(f) The board of regents or the university may solicit and accept gifts and grants from a public or private source for the benefit of the institute.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 317, Sec. 1, eff. May 29, 1999.

Sec. 87.107. CENTER FOR RELATIONSHIP VIOLENCE PREVENTION AND INTERVENTION. (a) The Center for Relationship Violence Prevention and Intervention is established at Prairie View A&M University.

(b) The organization, control, and management of the center is vested in the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(c) The board of regents shall approve the employment of personnel by and the operating budget of the center. An employee of the center is an employee of Prairie View A&M University.

(d) The center may:

(1) provide services to victims and perpetrators of relationship violence;

(2) serve as a shelter for victims of relationship violence in Waller County and surrounding communities;

(3) conduct, coordinate, collect, and evaluate research in all areas relating to relationship violence;

(4) provide a setting for educational programs relating to relationship violence, including:

(A) educational programs for students; and

(B) continuing education and training programs for campus personnel;

(5) serve as a state and national resource for information on relationship violence; and

(6) in connection with its research and educational programs:

(A) develop programs, policies, and strategies to address relationship violence and related social problems; and

(B) create partnerships, collaborative efforts, or outreach, public service, or technical assistance programs to assist communities, governmental agencies, or private entities to implement programs, policies, and strategies addressing relationship violence and related social problems.

(e) The center may enter into a cooperative agreement or contract with a public or private entity to perform the duties of the center.

(f) The board of regents may accept gifts and grants from a public or private source for the benefit of the center.

(g) Establishment of the center is subject to the availability of federal funding or other funding for that purpose. The board of regents may not use legislative appropriations, other than any gifts or grants subject to appropriation, to establish or operate the center.

Added by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 369, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Sec. 87.108. PRAIRIE VIEW A&M UNDERGRADUATE MEDICAL ACADEMY. (a) The Prairie View A&M Undergraduate Medical Academy is established at Prairie View A&M University.

(b) The organization, control, and management of the academy is vested in the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(c) The employment of personnel by and the operating budget of the institute are subject to the approval of the board of regents. An employee of the academy is an employee of Prairie View A&M University.

(d) The primary purpose of the academy is to prepare students for medical school.

(e) A student is eligible to apply for admission into the academy if the student:

(1) is enrolled in Prairie View A&M University with a major that requires completion of the prescribed core of basic science and mathematics courses needed as a foundation preparation for gaining admission into medical study at an accredited medical school in the United States;

(2) has completed at least one year of undergraduate college-level or university-level courses approved by the academy;

(3) has demonstrated interest in a medical career; and

(4) has met the academic achievement standards established for the academy by the academy's admissions committee in the student's undergraduate courses.

(f) The academy shall provide:

(1) academic and career counseling for academy students;

(2) faculty mentorship for each academy student;

(3) enriched undergraduate courses designed to strengthen academic preparation, including preparation for the Medical College Admission Test (MCAT), for future medical school applicants;

(4) preparation for the MCAT and instruction in standardized testing techniques;

(5) long-distance educational technology to allow interactive participation with medical schools, as appropriate;

(6) visitation to medical school educational sites; and

(7) visitation of medical school faculty to the academy for academic enrichment.

(g) A student admitted to the academy must enter into an agreement with the university under which the student agrees to:

(1) maintain the student's eligibility for continued enrollment in the academy; and

(2) repay any scholarship or stipend the student receives in connection with enrollment in the academy if the student:

(A) fails to apply to medical school in Texas and enrolls in a medical school outside of Texas; or

(B) declines an offer to attend medical school in Texas and enrolls in a medical school outside of Texas.

(h) The academy shall consult with the medical schools in Texas to ensure that its curriculum and practices are consistent with current medical school needs and requirements.

(i) The academy shall enter into cooperative programs, as appropriate, with medical schools in Texas to help achieve the goals of the academy.

(j) The academy shall incorporate into its curriculum current medical school educational practices, such as small group tutorials using problem-based instruction.

(k) The university shall enhance the facilities of the university as necessary to achieve the purposes of the academy.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 394, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER C. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY AT GALVESTON

Sec. 87.201. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY AT GALVESTON; ROLE AND MISSION. (a) Texas A&M University at Galveston is a special purpose institution of higher education for undergraduate and graduate instruction in marine and maritime studies in science, engineering, and business and for research and public service related to the general field of marine resources. The institution is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System, with degrees offered under the name and authority of Texas A&M University at College Station. The board of regents of The Texas A&M University System shall have the authority to designate Texas A&M University at Galveston as a branch of Texas A&M University; however, such designation, if made, shall not change the role and mission of Texas A&M University at Galveston as specified in this section.

(b) Texas A&M University at Galveston shall be a research institute supporting the marine sciences and oceanography programs at Texas A&M University and The University of Texas at Austin. Research endeavors benefitting the academic strength of Texas A&M University and The University of Texas at Austin or the economic strength of the State of Texas shall be conducted, with emphasis on establishing and maintaining an internationally recognized research institute to be named the Texas Institute of Oceanography. The Texas Institute of Oceanography may also contract with other institutions of higher education to provide research and other related services. Texas A&M University at College Station and The University of Texas at Austin are authorized to offer upper-level and graduate courses in marine sciences and oceanography at the Texas Institute of Oceanography that are supportive to their marine sciences and oceanography academic programs. Funding for research should be from private sources, competitively acquired sources, and appropriated public funding.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3206, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3051, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1981; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1098, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 1987; Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 638, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 28, 1989; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 132, Sec. 1, eff. May 19, 1997; Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 173, Sec. 1, eff. Aug. 30, 1999.

Sec. 87.202. GENERAL POWERS AND DUTIES. The board shall have the same powers and duties with respect to this university as are conferred on it by statute with respect to Texas A&M University.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3207, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3051, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1981; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1098, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 87.203. ADMISSION, DISCIPLINE, INSTRUCTION. The board shall prescribe the standards of admission and admit the applicants who meet the requirements. Students shall be subject to the regulations of conduct and discipline prescribed by the board. The board shall make provision for the proper instruction, for courses of study, and for the care, supervision, and management of the school; and the board is vested with all powers necessary for the proper discharge of these duties.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3207, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 87.204. FUNDS, PROPERTIES, AGREEMENTS. The board may receive any funds or property that may be subscribed, loaned, or bequeathed for the organization or maintenance of the university and shall execute all necessary agreements for the faithful application of the funds or property.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3207, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3051, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1981.

Sec. 87.205. FEES AND CHARGES. The fact that this university offers United States Maritime Service Cadet (license-option) students practical and technical instruction in the arts and sciences relating to the foregoing subjects, and the further fact that training in these fields will lead to immediate licensing in the United States Flag Fleet and remunerative employment for those who have finished the prescribed courses, make it necessary that larger fees be charged license-option students who enter the university than are now paid by non-license-option students enrolled in state-supported institutions of higher education. Therefore, the provisions of Subchapter E, Chapter 54 of this Code, do not apply to the license-option students enrolled in the university. The board is specifically charged with the duty of assessing such fees and charges against the students who enter the university as may be necessary to provide for the maintenance and support of the university.

Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3207, ch. 1024, art. 1, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1971. Amended by Acts 1981, 67th Leg., p. 3051, ch. 799, Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 1981; Acts 1987, 70th Leg., ch. 1098, Sec. 3, eff. June 20, 1987.

Sec. 87.206. INSTRUCTION IN FIELD OF MARINE RESOURCES. In addition to the instruction authorized in Section 87.201 of this code, the school or any other school created under this subchapter may provide instruction for all students in educational programs related to the general field of marine resources. Such courses must have the prior approval of the Coordinating Board, Texas College and University System.

Added by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 3348, ch. 1024, art. 2, Sec. 22, eff. Sept. 1, 1971.

Sec. 87.207. MOLLUSCAN SHELLFISH PROGRAMS. (a) The marine biology department of Texas A&M University at Galveston may:

(1) evaluate the expansion and production of oysters from private oyster leases during the months of May through October of each year; and

(2) study the possible impacts of conditions observed on public harvest outside that period.

(b) The marine biology department may investigate and provide information about oyster diseases and other concerns that may affect the availability of oysters for harvest. The investigation shall consider the effects of natural environmental conditions, including salinity, temperature, turbidity, and other natural environmental conditions, and shall also consider factors that may not be part of the natural environment, including chemical contamination, freshwater inflow alterations, and ballast water discharges.

(c) The marine biology department may investigate and provide information about organisms that may be associated with human illness that can be transmitted through the consumption of oysters, particularly Vibrio parahaemolyticus and Vibrio vulnificus. The investigation must consider factors such as natural occurrence, contamination, and the effects of time, temperature, and handling practices on the organisms.

(d) The marine biology department shall give priority to activities related to public health.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1298, Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 1999.

Sec. 87.208. SEABORNE CONSERVATION CORPS. If the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System administers a program that is substantially similar to the Seaborne Conservation Corps as it was administered by the board during the 1998-1999 school year, the program is entitled, for each student enrolled, to allotments from the Foundation School Program under Chapter 48 as if the program were a school district, except that the program has a local share applied that is equivalent to the local fund assignment of the school district in which the principal facilities of the program are located.

Added by Acts 1999, 76th Leg., ch. 1305, Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 1999. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 87.207 by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 1420, Sec. 21.001(25), eff. Sept. 1, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.068, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER D. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--KINGSVILLE

Sec. 87.301. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) Texas A&M University--Kingsville is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the city of Kingsville. The university is a component institution of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(b) The board has the same powers and duties concerning Texas A&M University--Kingsville as are conferred on it by statute concerning Texas A&M University.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 227, Sec. 2, eff. May 23, 1997.

Sec. 87.302. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board, with the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees as are offered at leading American universities and may award those degrees, including baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents.

(b) A new department, school, or degree program may not be instituted without the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The board shall adopt other rules for the operation, control, and management of the university as may be necessary for the conduct of the university as one of the first class.

(d) The board may make joint faculty appointments in the university and in other institutions under its governance. The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institution on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989.

SUBCHAPTER E. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--CORPUS CHRISTI

Sec. 87.401. ESTABLISHMENT; SCOPE. (a) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi is a general academic teaching institution located in the city of Corpus Christi.

(b) Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi is a component institution of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(c) The board has the same powers and duties concerning Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi as are conferred on the board by statute concerning Texas A&M University.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 5.06(a), (b), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 126, Sec. 3, eff. May 19, 1997.

Amended by:

Acts 2011, 82nd Leg., R.S., Ch. 618 (S.B. 633), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2011.

Sec. 87.402. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board, with the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees as are offered at leading American educational institutions and may award those degrees, including baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents.

(b) A new department, school, or degree program may not be instituted without the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The board shall adopt other rules for the operation, control, and management of the institution, including the determination of the number of students that may be admitted to any school, college, or degree-granting program, as may be necessary for the conduct of the institution as one of the first class.

(d) The board may make joint faculty appointments in Texas A&M University--Corpus Christi and in other institutions under its governance. The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institution on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 5.06(c), eff. Aug. 26, 1991; Acts 1997, 75th Leg., ch. 126, Sec. 3, eff. May 19, 1997.

SUBCHAPTER F. TEXAS A&M INTERNATIONAL UNIVERSITY

Sec. 87.501. ESTABLISHMENT; SCOPE. (a) Texas A&M International University is a coeducational educational institution located in the city of Laredo. The institution is a component institution of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(b) The board has the same powers and duties concerning Texas A&M International University as are conferred on it by statute concerning Texas A&M University.

(c) The institution may teach undergraduate or graduate level courses.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 134, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1991; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 87.502. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board, with the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, may prescribe courses leading to customary degrees as are offered at leading American educational institutions and may award those degrees.

(b) The degrees offered by the institution may include baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents.

(c) A new department, school, or degree program may not be instituted without the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(d) The board shall adopt other rules for the operation, control, and management of Texas A&M International University as may be necessary for the institution to be a first-class institution of higher education.

(e) The board may make joint faculty appointments in Texas A&M International University and in other institutions under its governance. The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institution on the basis of services rendered.

(f) The board, with the approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, may contract with the governing board of another general academic teaching institution, as defined by Section 61.003 of this code, or with the governing board of a college or university in Mexico and Canada, to offer joint degree programs.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 105, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 3, 5, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 4, eff. Sept. 1, 1995.

Sec. 87.503. GRADUATE SCHOOL OF INTERNATIONAL TRADE. Subject to the approval of the governing board of Texas A&M International University and the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board, a graduate school of international trade at Texas A&M International University shall be established.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 195, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 104.431 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(29), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 6, eff. Sept. 1, 1993.

Sec. 87.504. CENTER FOR BORDER ECONOMIC AND ENTERPRISE DEVELOPMENT. (a) The board shall establish a center for border economic and enterprise development at Texas A&M International University.

(b) The center established under this section may:

(1) develop and manage an economic data base concerning the Texas-Mexico border;

(2) perform economic development planning and research;

(3) provide technical assistance to industrial and governmental entities; and

(4) in cooperation with other state agencies, coordinate economic and enterprise development planning activities of state agencies to ensure that the economic needs of the Texas-Mexico border are integrated within a comprehensive state economic development plan.

(c) The center may offer seminars and conduct conferences and other educational programs concerning the Texas-Mexico border economy and economic and enterprise development within the state.

(d) The board may solicit and accept gifts, grants, and donations to aid in the establishment, maintenance, and operation of the center.

(e) The center established under this section shall cooperate fully with similar programs operated by The University of Texas at El Paso, The University of Texas Rio Grande Valley, and other institutions of higher education.

Added by Acts 1989, 71st Leg., ch. 586, Sec. 2, eff. Sept. 1, 1989. Renumbered from Education Code Sec. 104.431 by Acts 1991, 72nd Leg., ch. 16, Sec. 19.01(30), eff. Aug. 26, 1991. Amended by Acts 1993, 73rd Leg., ch. 260, Sec. 7, eff. Sept. 1, 1993; Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 632, Sec. 4, eff. June 13, 2001.

Amended by:

Acts 2021, 87th Leg., R.S., Ch. 188 (S.B. 1467), Sec. 8, eff. May 30, 2021.

Sec. 87.505. TEXAS ACADEMY OF INTERNATIONAL STUDIES. (a) In this section:

(1) "Academy" means the Texas Academy of International Studies.

(2) "Board" means the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(3) "University" means Texas A&M International University.

(b) The Texas Academy of International Studies is a division of Texas A&M International University and is under the management and control of the board. The academy serves the following purposes:

(1) to provide academically gifted and highly motivated junior and senior high school students with a challenging university-level curriculum that:

(A) allows students to complete high school graduation requirements for the foundation high school program and the distinguished level of achievement under the foundation high school program and earn appropriate endorsements as provided by Section 28.025, while attending for academic credit a public institution of higher education;

(B) fosters students' knowledge of real-world international issues and problems and teaches students to apply critical thinking and problem-solving skills to those issues and problems;

(C) includes the study of English, foreign languages, social studies, anthropology, and sociology;

(D) is presented through an interdisciplinary approach that introduces and develops issues, especially issues related to international concerns, throughout the curriculum; and

(E) offers students learning opportunities related to international issues through in-depth research and field-based studies;

(2) to provide students with an awareness of international career and professional development opportunities through seminars, workshops, collaboration with postsecondary students from other countries, summer academic international studies internships in foreign countries, and similar methods; and

(3) to provide students with social development activities that enrich the academic curriculum and student life, including, as determined appropriate by the academy, University Interscholastic League activities and other extracurricular activities generally offered by public high schools.

(c) The academy is a residential, coeducational institution for selected Texas high school students with an interest and the potential to excel in international studies. The academy shall admit only high school juniors and seniors, except that the academy may admit a student with exceptional abilities who is not yet a high school junior. The board shall set aside adequate space on the university campus in Laredo to operate the academy and implement the purposes of this section. The academy must operate on the same fall and spring semester basis as the university. Full-time students of the academy must enroll for both the fall and spring semesters. Faculty members of the university shall teach all academic classes at the academy. A student of the academy may attend a college course offered by the university and receive college credit for that course.

(d) Except as otherwise provided by this subsection, the university administration has the same powers and duties with respect to the academy that the administration has with respect to the university. The board shall consult with the dean of the College of Education and other members of the administration as the board considers necessary concerning the academy's administrative design and support, personnel and student issues, and faculty development. The board shall consult with the dean of the College of Arts and Sciences and other members of the administration as the board considers necessary concerning the academy's curriculum development, program design, and general faculty issues. The board, in consultation with university administration, shall:

(1) establish an internal management system for the academy and appoint an academy principal who serves at the will of the board and reports to the university provost;

(2) provide for one or more academy counselors;

(3) establish for the academy a site-based decision-making process similar to the process required by Subchapter F, Chapter 11, that provides for the participation of academy faculty, parents of academy students, and other members of the community; and

(4) establish an admissions process for the academy.

(e) The student-teacher ratio in all regular academic classes at the academy may not exceed 30 students for each classroom teacher, except that the student-teacher ratio may exceed that limit:

(1) in a program provided for the purposes prescribed by Subsection (b)(2) or another special enrichment course or in a physical education course; or

(2) if the board determines that a class with a higher student-teacher ratio would contribute to the educational development of the students in the class.

(f) The academy shall provide the university-level curriculum in a manner that is appropriate for the social, psychological, emotional, and physical development of high school juniors and seniors. The administrative and counseling personnel of the academy shall provide continuous support to and supervision of students.

(g) For each student enrolled in the academy, the academy is entitled to allotments from the foundation school fund under Chapter 48 as if the academy were a school district without a tier one local share for purposes of Section 48.266. If in any academic year the amount of the allotments under this subsection exceeds the amount of state funds paid to the academy in the first fiscal year of the academy's operation, the commissioner of education shall set aside from the total amount of funds to which school districts are entitled under Section 48.266(c) an amount equal to the excess amount and shall distribute that amount to the academy. After deducting the amount set aside and paid to the academy by the commissioner of education under this subsection, the commissioner of education shall reduce the amount to which each district is entitled under Section 48.266(c) in the manner described by Section 48.266(f). A determination of the commissioner of education under this subsection is final and may not be appealed.

(h) The board may use any available money, enter into contracts, and accept grants, including matching grants, federal grants, and grants from a corporation or other private contributor, in establishing and operating the academy. Money spent by the academy must further the purposes of the academy prescribed by Subsection (b).

(i) The liability of the state under Chapters 101 and 104, Civil Practice and Remedies Code, is limited for the academy and employees assigned to the academy and acting on behalf of the academy to the same extent that the liability of a school district and an employee of the school district is limited under Sections 22.0511, 22.0512, and 22.052 of this code and Section 101.051, Civil Practice and Remedies Code. An employee assigned to the academy is entitled to representation by the attorney general in a civil suit based on an action or omission of the employee in the course of the employee's employment, limits on liability, and indemnity under Chapters 104 and 108, Civil Practice and Remedies Code.

(j) Except as otherwise provided by this section, the academy is not subject to the provisions of this code, or to the rules of the Texas Education Agency, regulating public schools.

(k) Expired.

Added by Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1339 (S.B. 151), Sec. 5, eff. June 18, 2005.

Amended by:

Acts 2013, 83rd Leg., R.S., Ch. 211 (H.B. 5), Sec. 76(a), eff. June 10, 2013.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 943 (H.B. 3), Sec. 3.069, eff. September 1, 2019.

SUBCHAPTER G. EAST TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY

Sec. 87.551. ESTABLISHMENT. (a) East Texas State University is a coeducational institution of higher education with its main campus located in the City of Commerce. The university is a component of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(b) The board has the same powers and duties concerning the university as are conferred on the board by law concerning Texas A&M University.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 128, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.

Sec. 87.552. COURSES AND DEGREES; RULES; JOINT APPOINTMENTS. (a) The board may award baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees and their equivalents, but the board may not institute a department, school, or program without the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(b) A program offered by the metroplex commuter program:

(1) must be approved by the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board; and

(2) may not duplicate a program offered by another institution of higher education in the Dallas area.

(c) The board shall adopt other rules for the operation, control, and management of East Texas State University as may be necessary for the institution to be a first-class institution of higher education. The board may establish different rules for the operation of the facilities and programs at different locations of the institution.

(d) The board may make joint faculty appointments in East Texas State University and in other institutions under its governance. The salary of a person who receives a joint appointment shall be apportioned to the appointing institutions on the basis of services rendered.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 128, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1996.

SUBCHAPTER H. EAST TEXAS STATE UNIVERSITY AT TEXARKANA

Sec. 87.571. ESTABLISHMENT; POWERS AND DUTIES. (a) Texas A&M University--Texarkana is a coeducational institution of higher education located in the City of Texarkana. The university is a component of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(b) The board has the same powers and duties concerning the university as are conferred on the board by law concerning Texas A&M University. The university may offer lower-division courses, but is not required to do so in any academic year for which the legislature does not appropriate money specifically for that purpose.

(c) The university may offer lower-division courses on the campus of Texarkana College or in a permanent building located on property acquired by the university for a permanently relocated campus. The university may not offer lower-division courses on the campus of Texarkana College without prior approval from Texarkana College.

(d) A student enrolled at Texarkana College may be simultaneously enrolled at the university as long as the student meets the requirements for enrollment at the university.

Added by Acts 1995, 74th Leg., ch. 128, Sec. 8, eff. Sept. 1, 1996. Amended by Acts 2001, 77th Leg., ch. 203, Sec. 1, eff. May 21, 2001; Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1259, Sec. 1, eff. Sept. 1, 2003.

SUBCHAPTER K. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--SAN ANTONIO

Sec. 87.841. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--SAN ANTONIO. (a) Texas A&M University--San Antonio is a general academic teaching institution located in Bexar County. The university is a component institution of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(b) The board may prescribe courses leading to such customary degrees as are offered at leading American universities and may award those degrees. Those degrees may include baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees in all fields of study, including professional degrees. No department, school, or degree program may be instituted except with the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The board also has the same powers and duties concerning Texas A&M University--San Antonio as are conferred on the board by statute concerning Texas A&M University.

Text of subsection effective until May 23, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, Texas A&M University--San Antonio may not operate as a general academic teaching institution until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at the Texas A&M University--Kingsville System Center--San Antonio has reached an enrollment equivalent of:

(1) 1,000 full-time students for one semester if the legislature authorizes revenue bonds to be issued to finance educational and related facilities for the institution, and the bonds are issued for that purpose; or

(2) 2,500 full-time students for one semester if the conditions specified by Subdivision (1) are not satisfied.

Text of subsection effective on May 23, 2009, but only if a specific appropriation is provided as described by Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129, Sec. 4, which states: This Act does not make an appropriation. This Act takes effect only if a specific appropriation for the implementation of the Act is provided in a general appropriations act of the 81st Legislature.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, Texas A&M University--San Antonio may not operate as a general academic teaching institution until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at the Texas A&M University--Kingsville System Center--San Antonio has reached an enrollment equivalent of 1,000 full-time students for one semester.

(e) Expired.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 1, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 793 (S.B. 296), Sec. 1, eff. June 17, 2005.

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 129 (S.B. 629), Sec. 1, eff. May 23, 2009.

SUBCHAPTER L. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--CENTRAL TEXAS

Sec. 87.861. TEXAS A&M UNIVERSITY--CENTRAL TEXAS. (a) Texas A&M University--Central Texas is a general academic teaching institution located in Bell County. The university is a component institution of The Texas A&M University System and is under the management and control of the board of regents of The Texas A&M University System.

(b) The board may prescribe courses leading to such customary degrees as are offered at leading American universities and may award those degrees. Those degrees may include baccalaureate, master's, and doctoral degrees in all fields of study, including professional degrees. No department, school, or degree program may be instituted except with the prior approval of the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board.

(c) The board also has the same powers and duties concerning Texas A&M University--Central Texas as are conferred on the board by statute concerning Texas A&M University.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this subchapter, Texas A&M University--Central Texas may not operate as a general academic teaching institution until the Texas Higher Education Coordinating Board certifies that enrollment at the Tarleton State University System Center--Central Texas in Killeen has reached an enrollment equivalent of 1,000 full-time students for one semester.

Added by Acts 2003, 78th Leg., ch. 1188, Sec. 2, eff. June 20, 2003.

Amended by:

Acts 2005, 79th Leg., Ch. 1198 (H.B. 495), Sec. 1, eff. June 18, 2005.